California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(a) On or before June 30, 2009, the eligible county, as described in Section 195.120, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.121, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.120 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by the eligible county in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.121, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 386, Sec. 2.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

195.123.

(a) By September 30, 2008, the auditors of the Counties of Santa Barbara and Ventura, which were the subject of the Governor’s proclamation of a state of emergency for the Zaca Fire that commenced on July 4, 2007, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2007–08 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of that disaster, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 224, Sec. 7.   Effective September 21, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

195.124.

After the county auditor of the eligible county, as described in Section 195.123, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that section, the director shall within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 224, Sec. 8.   Effective September 21, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

195.125.

(a) On or before June 30, 2009, the eligible county, as described in Section 195.123, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.124, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.123 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by the eligible county in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.124, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 224, Sec. 9.   Effective September 21, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

195.128.

(a) By October 30, 2008, the auditors of the Counties of Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, Santa Barbara, and Ventura, which were the subject of the Governor’s disaster proclamations of September 15, 2007, and October 21, 2007, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2008–09 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of those disasters, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 386, Sec. 3.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

195.129.

After the county auditor of the eligible county, as described in Section 195.128, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that section, the director shall within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 386, Sec. 4.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

195.130.

(a) On or before June 30, 2009, the eligible county, as described in Section 195.128, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.129, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.128 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by an eligible county in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.129, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 386, Sec. 5.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

195.131.

(a) By October 30, 2008, the auditor of the County of Riverside, which was the subject of the Governor’s proclamation of a state of emergency for the extremely strong and damaging winds that commenced on October 20, 2007, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2008–09 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of those disasters, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 386, Sec. 6.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

195.132.

After the county auditor of the eligible county, as described in Section 195.131, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that section, the director shall within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 386, Sec. 7.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

195.133.

(a) On or before June 30, 2009, the eligible county, as described in Section 195.131, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.132, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.131 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by an eligible county in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.132, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 386, Sec. 8.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

195.134.

(a) By September 30, 2009, the auditors of the Counties of Butte, Kern, Mariposa, Mendocino, Monterey, Plumas, Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, Shasta, and Trinity, which were the subject of the Governor’s proclamations of a state of emergency for the wildfires that occurred during May or June 2008, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2008–09 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of those disasters, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 386, Sec. 9.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

195.135.

After the county auditor of the eligible county, as described in Section 195.134, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that section, the director shall within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 386, Sec. 10.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

195.136.

(a) On or before June 30, 2010, the eligible county, as described in Section 195.134, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.135, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.134 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by an eligible county in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.135, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 386, Sec. 11.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

195.137.

(a) By September 30, 2009, the auditor of the County of Santa Barbara, which was the subject of the Governor’s proclamation of a state of emergency for wildfires that commenced on July 1, 2008, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2008–09 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of those disasters, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 386, Sec. 12.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

195.138.

After the county auditor of the eligible county, as described in Section 195.137, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that section, the director shall within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 386, Sec. 13.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

195.139.

(a) On or before June 30, 2010, an eligible county, as described in Section 195.137, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.138, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.137 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by an eligible county in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.138, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 386, Sec. 14.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

195.140.

(a) By September 30, 2009, the auditor of the County of Inyo, which was the subject of the Governor’s proclamations of a state of emergency for wildfires that commenced on July 6, 2007, and the severe rainstorms that commenced on July 12, 2008, and caused flash floods, landslides, the accumulation of debris, and that washed-out and damaged roads in that county, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2008–09 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of that disaster, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 386, Sec. 15.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

195.141.

After the county auditor of an eligible county, as described in Section 195.140, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that section, the director shall, within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 386, Sec. 16.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

195.142.

(a) On or before June 30, 2010, each eligible county, as described in Section 195.140, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.141, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.140 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by an eligible county in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.141, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 386, Sec. 17.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

195.143.

(a) By September 30, 2009, the auditor of the County of Humboldt, which was the subject of the Governor’s proclamation of a state of emergency for wildfires that commenced on May 22, 2008, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2008–09 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of those disasters, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 386, Sec. 18.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

195.144.

After the county auditor of the eligible county, as described in Section 195.143, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that section, the director shall within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 386, Sec. 19.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

195.145.

(a) On or before June 30, 2010, an eligible county, as described in Section 195.143, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.144, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.143 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by an eligible county in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.144, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 386, Sec. 20.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

195.164.

(a) By October 30, 2010, the auditor of the County of Humboldt, which was the subject of the Governor’s proclamation of a state of emergency for the earthquake that occurred on January 9, 2010, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2009–10 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of that disaster, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of
 education.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 449, Sec. 1.   (AB 1690)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

195.165.

After the county auditor of the eligible county, as described in Section 195.164, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that section, the director shall, within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 449, Sec. 2.   (AB 1690)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

195.166.

(a) On or before June 30, 2011, an eligible county, as described in Section 195.164, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.165, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.164 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by an eligible county in the immediately
 preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.165, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 449, Sec. 3.   (AB 1690)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

195.167.

(a) By October 30, 2010, the auditors of the Counties of Calaveras, Imperial, Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Francisco, and Siskiyou, which were the subject of the Governor’s proclamations of a state of emergency for the severe winter storms that commenced in January 2010 that caused damage by the severe rainstorms, heavy snows, floods, or mudslides, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2009–10 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of those disasters,
 except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 447, Sec. 1.   (AB 1662)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

195.168.

After the county auditor of the eligible county, as described in Section 195.167, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that section, the director shall, within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 447, Sec. 2.   (AB 1662)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

195.169.

(a) On or before June 30, 2011, an eligible county, as described in Section 195.167, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.168, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.167 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by an eligible county in the immediately
 preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.168, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 447, Sec. 3.   (AB 1662)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

195.170.

(a) By October 30, 2010, the auditor of the County of Imperial, which was the subject of the Governor’s proclamation of a state of emergency for the earthquake that occurred on April 4, 2010, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2009–10 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of that disaster, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of
 education.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 461, Sec. 2.   (AB 2136)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

195.171.

After the county auditor of the eligible county, as described in Section 195.170, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that section, the director shall, within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 461, Sec. 3.   (AB 2136)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

195.172.

(a) On or before June 30, 2011, an eligible county, as described in Section 195.170, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.171, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.170 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by an eligible county in the immediately
 preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.171, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 461, Sec. 4.   (AB 2136)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

195.176.

(a) By October 30, 2011, the auditor of the County of San Mateo, which was the subject of the Governor’s proclamation of a state of emergency for the explosion and fire that occurred on September 9, 2010, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 2010–11 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of the explosion and fire, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 6th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 1.   (AB 11 6x)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

195.177.

After the county auditor of the County of San Mateo has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to Section 195.176, the director shall, within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 6th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 2.   (AB 11 6x)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

195.178.

(a) On or before June 30, 2012, the County of San Mateo shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.177, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.176 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts, other than basic state aid school districts, and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by the County of San Mateo in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence,
 exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.177, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that county.

(b) For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 6th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 3.   (AB 11 6x)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

196.1.
